Utah statutes.
57-8a-211.   Reserve analysis -- Reserve fund.

(1)  As used in this section, "reserve analysis" means an analysis to determine:

(a)  the need for a reserve fund to accumulate money to cover the cost of repairing, replacing, and restoring common areas that have a useful life of three years or more, but excluding any cost that can reasonably be funded from the association's general budget or from other association funds; and

(b)  the appropriate amount of any reserve fund.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in the governing documents, a board shall:

(a) (i)  subject to Subsection (2)(a)(ii), cause a reserve analysis to be conducted no less frequently than every five years; and

(ii)  if no reserve analysis has been conducted since March 1, 2008, cause a reserve analysis to be conducted before July 1, 2012; and

(b)  review and, if necessary, update a previously conducted reserve analysis no less frequently than every two years.

(3)  The board may conduct a reserve analysis itself or may engage a reliable person or organization, as determined by the board, to conduct the reserve analysis.

(4) (a)  A board may not use money in a reserve fund:

(i)  for daily maintenance expenses, unless a majority of association members vote to approve the use of reserve fund money for that purpose; or

(ii)  for any purpose other than the purpose for which the reserve fund was established.

(b)  A board shall maintain a reserve fund separate from other association funds.

(c)  This Subsection (4) may not be construed to limit a board from prudently investing money in a reserve fund, subject to any investment constraints imposed by the governing documents.

(5)  Subsections (2), (3), and (4) do not apply to an association during the period of administrative control.

